Maryland, session 2025, SB0348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–902.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Camera” includes any electronic device that can be used
surreptitiously to observe an individual.
(3) “Female breast” means a portion of the female breast below the top of
the areola.
(4) “Private area of an individual” means the naked or undergarment–clad
genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or female breast of an individual.
(5) (i) “Private place” means a room in which a person can reasonably
be expected to fully or partially disrobe and has a reasonable expectation of privacy,
INCLUDING in:
1. an office, business, or store;
2. a recreational facility;
– 1 –

Ch. 152 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. a restaurant or tavern;
4. a hotel, motel, or other lodging facility;
5. a theater or sports arena;
6. a school or other educational institution;
7. a bank or other financial institution;
8. any part of a family child care home used for the care and
custody of a child; [or]
9. A RESIDENCE; OR
10. another place of PRIVATE OR public use or
accommodation.
(ii) “Private place” includes a tanning room, dressing room, bedroom,
or restroom.
(6) (i) “Visual surveillance” means the deliberate, surreptitious
observation of an individual by any means.
(ii) “Visual surveillance” includes surveillance by:
1. direct sight;
2. the use of mirrors; or
3. the use of cameras.
(iii) “Visual surveillance” does not include a casual, momentary, or
unintentional observation of an individual.
(b) This section does not apply to a person who without prurient intent:
(1) conducts filming by or for the print or broadcast media;
(2) conducts or procures another to conduct visual surveillance of an
individual to protect property or public safety or prevent crime; or
(3) conducts visual surveillance and:
(i) holds a license issued under Title 13 or Title 19 of the Business
Occupations and Professions Article; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 152
(ii) is acting within the scope of the person’s occupation.
(c) A person may not with prurient intent conduct or procure another to conduct
visual surveillance of:
(1) an individual in a private place without the consent of that individual;
or
(2) the private area of an individual by use of a camera without the consent
of the individual under circumstances in which a reasonable person would believe that the
private area of the individual would not be visible to the public, regardless of whether the
individual is in a public or private place THE LOCATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL.
(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or a fine not exceeding $2,500 or both.
(e) (1) An individual who was under visual surveillance in violation of this
section has a civil cause of action against any person who conducted or procured another to
conduct the visual surveillance.
(2) In an action under this subsection, the court may award actual damages
and reasonable attorney’s fees.
(f) This section does not affect any legal or equitable right or remedy otherwise
provided by law.
(g) This section does not affect the application of § 3–901 of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 3 –